Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3205
Sections; exceptions.

Sections 29-3201 to 29-3210 do not apply to any person in this state confined as mentally ill or under sentence of death.

Laws 1969, c. 229, § 5, p. 855;

Laws 1986, LB 1177, § 11;

Laws 2015, LB268, § 25;

Referendum 2016, No. 426.
The changes made to section 29-3205 by Laws 2015, LB 268, section 25, have been omitted because of the vote on the referendum at the November 2016 general election.